Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska88-537
Duplicate receipt; issuance; requirements; liability.

When a negotiable warehouse receipt has been lost or destroyed, the commission may approve the delivery of the grain or the issuance of a duplicate receipt upon satisfactory proof of such loss or destruction if the party who requests it furnishes a bond with corporate or personal surety, to be approved by the commission, conditioned to indemnify the warehouse licensee or any holder or other person entitled to the grain against all loss, liability, or expense which may be sustained by reason of such delivery. The delivery of the grain or the issuance of a duplicate receipt pursuant to the approval of the commission shall not relieve the warehouse licensee from liability to a person to whom the negotiable receipt has been or will be negotiated for value without notice of the proceedings before the commission or of the delivery of the grain or the issuance of the duplicate receipt pursuant to such proceedings.

Laws 1987, LB 164, § 13.